oideachais/teanga/kscanne/nishanimate/morph/otw.aff
SET UTF-8
WORDCHARS -'

CIRCUMFIX Z
NEEDAFFIX X

# possessive person prefix, first person
# Valentine p. 199: "Prefixes attached to stems beginning with a vowel
# have a linking element /d/..."
# Also, we're including "reanalyzed" prefixes here as well, see
# Valentine p. 62ff, p. 199.
PFX	N	Y	7
PFX	N	0	n/Z	[^aeiou]	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	nd/Z	[aeiu]	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	nd/Z	oo	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	ndo/Z	o[^o]	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	ndi-/Z	.	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	nda-/Z	.	ip:poss1
PFX	N	0	ndoo-/Z	.	ip:poss1

# possessive person prefix, second person
PFX	G	Y	7
PFX	G	0	g/Z	[^aeiou]	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gd/Z	[aeiu]	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gd/Z	oo	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gdo/Z	o[^o]	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gdi-/Z	.	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gda-/Z	.	ip:poss2
PFX	G	0	gdoo-/Z	.	ip:poss2

# possessive person prefix, third person
PFX	W	Y	7
PFX	W	0	w/Z	[^aeiou]	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wd/Z	[aeiu]	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wd/Z	oo	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wdo/Z	o[^o]	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wdi-/Z	.	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wda-/Z	.	ip:poss3
PFX	W	0	wdoo-/Z	.	ip:poss3
